Utah statutes.
17B-2a-510.   Rules for the distribution and use of water.

(1)  Each irrigation district board of trustees shall establish equitable rules for the distribution and use of water among the owners of land in the district.

(2)  The board of trustees of an irrigation district that establishes rules under Subsection (1) shall, as soon as the rules are adopted, print them in convenient form for distribution in the district.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

